Texas, session 892, HB294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 11, Tax Code, is amended by adding Section 11.272 to read as follows: Sec. 11.272.  ENERGY EFFICIENCY-RELATED IMPROVEMENTS TO RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.  (a)  In this section, "energy efficiency-related improvement" means an improvement or technology that reduces the amount of energy needed to perform the basic functions of a property, including: (1)  a high-efficiency heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system; (2)  a central air conditioning demand response technology; (3)  a high-efficiency heat pump; (4)  attic insulation; (5)  a radiant barrier; (6)  a smart thermostat; (7)  a high-efficiency water heater; (8)  an electric vehicle charging demand response technology; (9)  high-efficiency windows; and (10)  the sealing or resealing of doors, windows, or other openings. (b)  A person is entitled to an exemption from taxation of the amount of the appraised value of residential real property owned by the person that arises from the installation in the property of an energy efficiency-related improvement if: (1)  the original construction of the property was completed before January 1, 2011; and (2)  the improvement was installed on or after January 1, 2027. (c)  The comptroller, with the assistance of the State Energy Conservation Office or its successor, shall develop guidelines to assist local officials in the administration of this section. SECTION 2.  If the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 34, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is approved by the voters and the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 133, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is not approved by the voters, Section 11.43(c), Tax Code, as amended by H.B. 2730, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, and H.B. 247, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective January 1, 2026, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (c)  An exemption provided by Section 11.13, 11.131, 11.132, 11.133, 11.134, 11.17, 11.18, 11.182, 11.1827, 11.183, 11.19, 11.20, 11.21, 11.22, 11.23(a), (h), (j), (j-1), or (m), 11.231, 11.254, 11.27, 11.271, 11.272, 11.29, 11.30, 11.31, 11.315, 11.35, 11.36, 11.37, or 11.38, once allowed, need not be claimed in subsequent years, and except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), the exemption applies to the property until it changes ownership or the person's qualification for the exemption changes. However, except as provided by Subsection (r), and subject to Subsection (c-1), the chief appraiser may require a person allowed one of the exemptions in a prior year to file a new application to confirm the person's current qualification for the exemption by delivering a written notice that a new application is required, accompanied by an appropriate application form, to the person previously allowed the exemption.  If the person previously allowed the exemption is 65 years of age or older, the chief appraiser may not cancel the exemption due to the person's failure to file the new application unless the chief appraiser complies with the requirements of Subsection (q), if applicable. SECTION 3.  If the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 133, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is approved by the voters and the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 34, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is not approved by the voters, Section 11.43(c), Tax Code, as amended by H.B. 2730, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, and H.B. 2508, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective January 1, 2026, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (c)  An exemption provided by Section 11.13, 11.131, 11.132, 11.133, 11.134, 11.136, 11.17, 11.18, 11.182, 11.1827, 11.183, 11.19, 11.20, 11.21, 11.22, 11.23(a), (h), (j), (j-1), or (m), 11.231, 11.254, 11.27, 11.271, 11.272, 11.29, 11.30, 11.31, 11.315, 11.35, 11.36, or 11.37, once allowed, need not be claimed in subsequent years, and except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), the exemption applies to the property until it changes ownership or the person's qualification for the exemption changes. However, except as provided by Subsection (r), and subject to Subsection (c-1), the chief appraiser may require a person allowed one of the exemptions in a prior year to file a new application to confirm the person's current qualification for the exemption by delivering a written notice that a new application is required, accompanied by an appropriate application form, to the person previously allowed the exemption.  If the person previously allowed the exemption is 65 years of age or older, the chief appraiser may not cancel the exemption due to the person's failure to file the new application unless the chief appraiser complies with the requirements of Subsection (q), if applicable. SECTION 4.  If both the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 34, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 133, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, are approved by the voters, Section 11.43(c), Tax Code, as amended by H.B. 2730, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, and H.B. 247 and H.B.  2508, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective January 1, 2026, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (c)  An exemption provided by Section 11.13, 11.131, 11.132, 11.133, 11.134, 11.136, 11.17, 11.18, 11.182, 11.1827, 11.183, 11.19, 11.20, 11.21, 11.22, 11.23(a), (h), (j), (j-1), or (m), 11.231, 11.254, 11.27, 11.271, 11.272, 11.29, 11.30, 11.31, 11.315, 11.35, 11.36, 11.37, or 11.38, once allowed, need not be claimed in subsequent years, and except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), the exemption applies to the property until it changes ownership or the person's qualification for the exemption changes. However, except as provided by Subsection (r), and subject to Subsection (c-1), the chief appraiser may require a person allowed one of the exemptions in a prior year to file a new application to confirm the person's current qualification for the exemption by delivering a written notice that a new application is required, accompanied by an appropriate application form, to the person previously allowed the exemption.  If the person previously allowed the exemption is 65 years of age or older, the chief appraiser may not cancel the exemption due to the person's failure to file the new application unless the chief appraiser complies with the requirements of Subsection (q), if applicable. SECTION 5.  If neither the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 34, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, nor the constitutional amendment proposed by H.J.R. 133, 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, is approved by the voters, Section 11.43(c), Tax Code, as amended by H.B. 2730, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and H.B. 1620, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is reenacted and amended to read as follows: (c)  An exemption provided by Section 11.13, 11.131, 11.132, 11.133, 11.134, 11.17, 11.18, 11.182, 11.1827, 11.183, 11.19, 11.20, 11.21, 11.22, 11.23(a), (h), (j), (j-1), or (m), 11.231, 11.254, 11.27, 11.271, 11.272, 11.29, 11.30, 11.31, 11.315, 11.35, 11.36, or 11.37, once allowed, need not be claimed in subsequent years, and except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), the exemption applies to the property until it changes ownership or the person's qualification for the exemption changes.  However, except as provided by Subsection (r), and subject to Subsection (c-1), the chief appraiser may require a person allowed one of the exemptions in a prior year to file a new application to confirm the person's current qualification for the exemption by delivering a written notice that a new application is required, accompanied by an appropriate application form, to the person previously allowed the exemption.  If the person previously allowed the exemption is 65 years of age or older, the chief appraiser may not cancel the exemption due to the person's failure to file the new application unless the chief appraiser complies with the requirements of Subsection (q), if applicable. SECTION 6.  This Act applies only to a tax year that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 7.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2027, but only if the constitutional amendment proposed by the 89th Legislature, 2nd Called Session, 2025, to authorize the legislature to provide for an exemption from ad valorem taxation of the amount of the market value of residential real property that arises from the installation in the property of certain energy efficiency-related improvements is approved by the voters.  If that amendment is not approved by the voters, this Act has no effect.